Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1431
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 85-1430 to 85-1435:

(1) Administrator means any employee of a Nebraska public postsecondary institution whose primary duties include executive, managerial, or supervisory responsibilities, including presidents, chancellors, vice presidents, provosts, deans, associate or assistant deans, and other comparable positions;

(2) Adjunct faculty means instructional personnel employed on a part-time, temporary, or course-by-course basis, regardless of title, and who are not employed on a full-time continuing contract;

(3) Commission means the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education;

(4) Employment classification means the category of employment under which an employee is engaged by a postsecondary institution, including:

(a) Full-time or part-time status;

(b) Permanent, probationary, temporary, or contract status;

(c) Tenured, tenure-track, nontenure-track, or nontenured status, when applicable; and

(d) Any other classification used by the institution to distinguish categories of employment for compensation, workload, or benefit purposes;

(5) Instructional faculty means employees whose primary responsibilities include teaching, research, or public service, including professors, associate professors, assistant professors, instructors, lecturers, and comparable academic titles, whether tenured or nontenured;

(6) Nebraska public postsecondary institution has the same meaning as in section 85-2403;

(7) Rank or position within each employee group means the title, level, or designation assigned by a postsecondary institution to differentiate employees within an employee group based on responsibility, experience, academic standing, or administrative authority, including:

(a) For instructional faculty, academic rank such as professor, associate professor, assistant professor, instructor, lecturer, or comparable titles; and

(b) For adjunct faculty, instructional designation or course-based title used by the institution; and

(8) Salary and benefits data means compensation information including wages, salaries, and employer-paid benefits.

Laws 2026, LB956, § 2.
July 1, 2026